Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202083-113
Department of Health and Human Services; examination of employees; investigation of alleged abuses; report.

The Department of Health and Human Services may examine any of the officers, attendants, guards, and other employees and make such inquiries as will determine their fitness for their respective duties and shall investigate and report to the Governor any abuses or wrongs alleged to exist in the institution. The department shall also electronically submit any such report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature.

Laws 1913, c. 179, § 18, p. 542;

R.S.1913, § 7196;

C.S.1922, § 6847;

C.S.1929, § 83-118;

R.S.1943, § 83-113;

Laws 1961, c. 416, § 16, p. 1271;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 902;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 780;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 19.
November 14, 2020